California statutes. Insurance Code
(k) Nothing in this section shall cause a disability insurer to be defined as a health care provider for purposes of any provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 6146 of the Business and Professions Code, Sections 3333.1 and 3333.2 of the Civil Code, and Sections 340.5, 364, 425.13, 667.7, and 1295 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   (SB 1120)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.137.

(a) Each contract between a health insurer and a provider shall contain provisions requiring a fast, fair, and cost-effective dispute resolution mechanism under which providers may submit disputes to the insurer, and requiring the insurer to inform its providers, upon contracting with the insurer, or upon change to these provisions, of the procedures for processing and resolving disputes, including the location and telephone number where information regarding disputes may be submitted.

(b) An insurer shall also ensure that a dispute resolution mechanism is accessible to noncontracting providers for the purpose of resolving billing and claims disputes.

(c) Disputes are to be submitted to the insurer in writing and shall include provider name, provider tax identification number, patient name, insurer’s identification information, dates of service, description of dispute, and, if applicable, billed and paid amounts. The insurer shall resolve each provider dispute consistent with applicable law and issue a written determination within 45 working days after the date of receipt of the provider dispute.

(d) On and after July 1, 2007, an insurer shall annually submit a report to the department regarding its dispute resolution mechanism. The report shall be public information and include, at a minimum, information on the number of providers that utilized the dispute resolution mechanism and a summary of the disposition of those disputes. To the extent the commissioner requires detailed information disclosing emerging or established patterns of provider disputes or corrective action by the insurer, the commissioner may maintain the confidentiality of any information found to be proprietary, upon written request of the insurer. In no event shall the commissioner find the required minimum information described in this subdivision to be proprietary.

(e) If an insurer has an affiliated or subsidiary company that is licensed as a health care service plan under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, the insurer may use the same procedures relating to the provider dispute resolution process established by the affiliated or subsidiary entity pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1367 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 723, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.14.

On and after January 1, 1990, every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan containing hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits or service benefits may provide coverage for the treatment of alcoholism, chemical dependency, or nicotine use under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the self-insured welfare benefit plan and the member, where the treatment may take place in facilities licensed to provide alcoholism or chemical dependency services under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

Treatment for nicotine use may be subject to separate deductibles, copayments, and overall cost limitations as determined by the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 688, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.141.

(a) Every policy of expense incurred hospital, medical, or surgical insurance issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1991, on a group basis, except for policies that only provide coverage for specified diseases or other limited benefit coverage, shall offer coverage as an option for special footwear needed by persons who suffer from foot disfigurement under the terms and conditions agreed upon between the group contract holder and the insurer.

(b) As used in this section, foot disfigurement shall include, but not be limited to, disfigurement from cerebral palsy, arthritis, polio, spina bifida, and diabetes, and foot disfigurement caused by accident or developmental disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 463.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.145.

(a) (1) Whenever an insurer issuing group or individual policies of disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses determines that in reimbursing a claim for provider services an institutional or professional provider has been overpaid, and then notifies the provider in writing through a separate notice identifying the overpayment and the amount of the overpayment, the provider shall reimburse the insurer within 30 working days of receipt by the provider of the notice of overpayment unless the overpayment or portion thereof is contested by the provider in which
 case the insurer shall be notified, in writing, within 30 working days. The notice that an overpayment is being contested shall identify the portion of the overpayment that is contested and the specific reasons for contesting the overpayment.

(2) If the provider does not make reimbursement for an uncontested overpayment within 30 working days after receipt, interest shall accrue at the rate of 10 percent per annum beginning with the first calendar day after the 30-working-day period.

(3) A prorated cost-sharing payment, or any portion thereof, made to a pharmacist for the dispensing of a partial fill pursuant to Section 4052.10 of the Business and Professions Code shall not be considered to be an overpayment pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) This subdivision shall only apply to a health insurance policy covering dental services or a specialized health insurance policy covering dental services.

(2) The insurer’s notice of overpayment shall inform the provider how to access the insurer’s dispute resolution mechanism offered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10123.137. The notice shall include the name and address to which the dispute should be submitted and a statement that Section 10123.145 of the Insurance Code requires a provider to reimburse the
 insurer for an overpayment within 30 working days of receipt by the provider of the notice of overpayment unless the provider contests the overpayment within 30 working days. The notice shall also include information clearly identifying the claim, the name of the patient, the date of service, and a clear explanation of the basis upon which the insurer believes the amount paid on the claim was in excess of the amount due, including interest and penalties on the claim. The notice shall also include a statement that if the provider does not make reimbursement of an uncontested overpayment within 30 working days after receipt of the notice, interest shall accrue at a rate of 10 percent per annum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 615, Sec. 5.   (AB 1048)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.146.

(a) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) (A) “Affirmative consent” means a dental provider’s express consent to opt in or opt out of receiving fee-based payment. Affirmative consent requires a dental provider’s signature. The terms of the affirmative consent shall be clear and readily understandable.

(B) Affirmative consent may be given through email.

(C) A provider accessing funds does not constitute affirmative consent to receive a fee-based payment.

(2) “Contracted vendor” means a third party facilitating payment processing on behalf of the health insurer.

(3) “Dental provider” means an individual or group of individuals licensed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Fee-based payment” refers to any payment type that requires the dental provider to incur a fee from the health insurer or its contracted vendor to access payment from a plan or its contracted vendor.

(5) “Health insurer” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10120.41.

(6) “Signature” includes an electronic or digital signature if the form of the signature is recognized as a valid signature under applicable federal or state law, including, but not limited to, checking a box indicating affirmative consent.

(b) (1) A health insurer that provides payment directly, or through a contracted vendor, to a dental
 provider shall have a non-fee-based default method of payment.

(2) The health insurer shall remit or associate with each payment the claims and claim details associated with payment.

(c) (1) A health insurer or its contracted vendor shall obtain affirmative consent from a dental provider who opts in to a fee-based payment method before the insurer or vendor provides a fee-based payment method to the provider.

(2) At the time a dental provider opts in to a fee-based payment method, the
 health insurer or its contracted vendor shall provide information on the payment method, including a notice of the fees charged by the health insurer or contracted vendor, alternative methods of payment, instructions on how to opt out of the fee-based payment method, and a notice of the dental provider’s ability to opt out of the fee-based payment method at any time.

(3) Upon receipt of the dental provider’s affirmative consent, the health insurer or its contracted vendor subsequently may issue payments to the dental provider using a fee-based payment method.

(4) The health insurer also shall notify the dental provider if its contracted vendor is sharing a part of the profit, fee arrangement, or board composition with the health insurer.

(d) (1) A dental provider may opt out of a fee-based payment method and opt in to a non-fee-based payment method at any time by providing affirmative consent to the health insurer or its contracted vendor.

(2) If a dental provider opts in or opts out of a method of payment pursuant to this subdivision, the provider’s payment method decision shall remain in effect until the provider informs the health insurer or contracted vendor of another preferred method of payment, including fee-based or non-fee-based methods.

(e) A health insurer or its contracted vendor that obtains a
 dental provider’s affirmative consent to opt in or opt out of a fee-based payment method shall apply the decision to include both of the following:

(1) The dental provider’s entire practice.

(2) To all products or services covered by the health insurer pursuant to a contract with the dental provider, including network provider contracts, as described in Section 10120.4.

(f) This section does not apply if a health insurer has a direct contract with a provider that allows the provider to choose payment methods, including a non-fee-based payment method for services rendered. 

(g) This
 section shall become operative on April 1, 2026, and apply to all health insurance policies issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.147.

(a) Every insurer issuing group or individual policies of health insurance that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, including those telehealth services covered by the insurer as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, shall reimburse a
 complete claim or portion thereof, whether in state or out of state, as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 calendar days after receipt of the complete claim by the insurer. However, an insurer may contest or deny a claim, or portion thereof, by notifying
 the claimant, in writing, that the claim is contested or denied, within 30 calendar days after receipt of the claim by the insurer. The notice that a claim, or portion thereof, is contested shall identify the portion of the claim that is contested, by procedure or revenue code, and the specific information needed from the provider to reconsider the claim. The notice that a claim, or portion thereof, is denied shall identify the portion of the claim that is denied, by procedure or revenue code, and the specific reasons for the denial, including the factual and legal basis known at that time by the insurer for each reason. If the reason is based solely on facts or solely on law, the insurer is required to provide only the factual or legal basis for its reason to deny the claim. The insurer shall provide a copy of the notice required by this subdivision to each insured who received services
 pursuant to the claim that was contested or denied and to the insured’s health care provider that provided the services at issue. The notice required by this subdivision shall include a statement advising the provider who submitted the claim on behalf of the insured or pursuant to a contract for alternative rates of payment and the insured that either may seek review by the department of a claim that was contested or denied by the insurer and the address, internet website address, and telephone number of the unit within the department that performs this review function. The notice to the provider may be included on either the explanation of benefits or remittance advice and shall also contain a statement advising the provider of its right to enter into the dispute resolution process described in Section 10123.137. An insurer may delay payment of an uncontested portion of a complete claim for reconsideration of a contested portion of that claim so long as the insurer pays those charges specified in
 subdivision (b).

(b) If a complete claim or portion thereof that is neither contested nor denied is not reimbursed by delivery to the claimant’s address of record within the 30 calendar days after receipt, the insurer shall pay the greater of fifteen dollars ($15) per year or a rate of 15 percent per annum beginning with the first calendar day after the 30-calendar-day period. An insurer shall automatically include the fifteen dollars ($15) per year or interest due in the payment made to the claimant, without requiring a request therefor. An insurer failing to comply with this requirement shall pay the claimant the greater of
 an additional fifteen dollars ($15) or a fee of 10 percent of the accrued interest.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a claim or portion thereof, is reasonably contested if the insurer has not received the completed claim. A paper claim from an institutional provider shall be deemed complete upon submission of a legible emergency department report and a completed UB 92 or other format adopted by the National Uniform Billing Committee, and reasonable relevant information requested by the insurer within 30 calendar days of receipt of the claim. An electronic claim from an institutional provider shall be deemed complete upon submission of an electronic equivalent to the UB 92 or other format adopted by the National Uniform Billing Committee, and reasonable relevant information requested by the insurer
 within 30 calendar days of receipt of the claim. However, if the insurer requests a copy of the emergency department report within the 30 calendar days after receipt of the electronic claim from the institutional provider, the insurer may also request additional reasonable relevant information within 30 calendar days of receipt of the emergency department report, at which time the claim shall be deemed complete. A claim from a professional provider shall be deemed complete upon submission of a completed HCFA 1500 or its electronic equivalent or other format adopted by the National Uniform Billing Committee, and reasonable relevant information requested by the insurer within 30 calendar days of receipt of the claim. The provider shall provide the insurer reasonable relevant
 information within 10 working days of receipt of a written request that is clear and specific regarding the information sought. If, as a result of reviewing the reasonable relevant information, the insurer requires further information, the insurer shall have an additional 15 calendar days after receipt of the reasonable relevant information to request the further information, notwithstanding any time limit to the contrary in this section, at which time the claim shall be deemed complete.

(d) This section shall not apply to claims about which there is evidence of fraud and misrepresentation, to eligibility determinations, or in instances where the plan
 has not been granted reasonable access to information under the provider’s control.
 An insurer shall specify, in a written notice to the provider within 30 calendar days of receipt of the claim, which, if any, of these exceptions applies to a claim.

(e) If a claim or portion thereof is contested on the basis that the insurer has not received information reasonably necessary to determine payer liability for the claim or portion thereof, then the insurer shall have 30 calendar days after receipt of this additional information to complete reconsideration of the claim. If a claim, or portion thereof, undergoing reconsideration is not reimbursed by delivery to the claimant’s address of record within the 30 calendar days after receipt of the additional information, the insurer shall pay interest at the rate of 15 percent per annum beginning with the first calendar day after the 30-calendar-day period. An
 insurer shall automatically include interest due in the payment made to the claimant, without requiring a request therefor.

(f) An insurer shall not delay payment on a claim from a physician or other provider to await the submission of a claim from a hospital or other provider, without citing specific rationale as to why the delay was necessary and providing a monthly update regarding the status of the claim and the insurer’s actions to resolve the claim, to the provider that submitted the claim.

(g) An insurer shall not request or require that a provider waive its rights pursuant to this section.

(h) This section shall apply only to claims for services rendered to a patient who was provided emergency services and care as defined
 in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code in the United States on or after September 1, 1999.

(i) This section shall not be construed to affect the rights or obligations of any person pursuant to Section 10123.13.

(j) This section shall not be construed to affect a written agreement, if any, of a provider to submit bills within a specified time period.

(k) (1) The department may issue guidance and regulations relating to this section. The guidance and
 regulations shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until December 31, 2027.

(2) After January 1, 2028, the department may issue regulations relating to this section subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act ((Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until December 31, 2030.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 763, Sec. 9.   (AB 3275)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.15.

Every group policy of disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, and surgical expenses on a group basis, and which offers coverage for disorders of the brain shall also offer coverage in the same manner for the treatment of the following biologically based severe mental disorders: schizophrenia, schizo-affective disorder, bipolar disorders and delusional depressions, and pervasive developmental disorder. Coverage for these mental disorders shall be subject to the same terms and conditions applied to the treatment of other disorders of the brain; however, an insurer may reserve the right to confirm diagnoses and to review the appropriateness of specific treatment plans as necessary to ensure that coverage under this section is provided for only those diagnostic and treatment services which are medically necessary.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the scope of licensure of any health care professional nor to impair rights to reimbursement guaranteed health care providers pursuant to Section 10176.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 462, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.16.

Except for a preexisting condition, every disability insurer issuing policies of individual or group disability insurance in this state that offers group or individual coverage for long-term care facility services or home-based care shall not exclude persons covered by the plan from receiving these benefits, if they are diagnosed as having any significant destruction of brain tissue with resultant loss of brain function, including, but not limited to, progressive, degenerative, and dementing illnesses, including, but not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease, from the coverage offered for long-term care facility services or home-based care.

For purposes of this section, where a particular disease can be determined only with an autopsy, “diagnosed” means clinical diagnosis not dependent on pathological confirmation, but employing nationally accepted criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1049, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.17.

Except for a preexisting condition, every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan in this state that offers group coverage for long-term care facility services or home-based care shall not exclude persons covered by the plan from receiving these benefits, if they are diagnosed as having any significant destruction of brain tissue with resultant loss of brain function, including, but not limited to, progressive, degenerative, and dementing illnesses, including, but not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease, from the coverage offered for long-term care facility services or home-based care.

For purposes of this section, where a particular disease can be determined only with an autopsy, “diagnosed” means clinical diagnosis not dependent on pathological confirmation, but employing nationally accepted criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1049, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.18.

(a) A disability insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, and that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits shall provide coverage, upon the referral of a patient’s physician and surgeon, a nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife, providing care to the patient and operating within the scope of practice otherwise permitted for the licensee, for an annual cervical cancer screening test.

(1) The coverage for an annual cervical cancer screening test provided pursuant to this section shall include the conventional Pap test, a human papillomavirus screening test that is approved by
 the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and the option of any cervical cancer screening test approved by the FDA, upon the referral of the patient’s health care provider.

(2) This subdivision does not require an individual or group policy to cover treatment or surgery for cervical cancer or to prevent application of deductible or copayment provisions contained in the policy or certificate, and does not require that coverage under an individual or group policy be extended to any other procedures.

(b) A disability insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits shall provide coverage for the human papillomavirus vaccine for insureds for whom the vaccine is
 approved by the FDA. The policy shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant to this subdivision. 

(c) This section shall not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance. For accident-only, hospital indemnity, or specified disease insurance, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply only to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or certificate. This section does not impose a new benefit mandate on accident-only, hospital indemnity, or specified disease insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 809, Sec. 7.   (AB 659)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.184.

(a) Every group policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, and that provides maternity benefits, that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 1999, and every individual policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, and that provides maternity benefits, that is of a type and form first offered for sale on or after January 1, 1999, shall provide coverage for participation in the California Prenatal Screening Program, which is a statewide prenatal testing program administered by the State Department of Public Health, pursuant to Section 124977 of the Health and Safety Code. Notwithstanding any other law, a disability insurer that provides
 coverage for maternity benefits shall not require participation in the statewide prenatal testing program administered by the State Department of Public Health as a prerequisite to eligibility for, or receipt of, any other service.

(b) Coverage required under this section shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing.

(c) Reimbursement for services covered pursuant to this section shall be paid at the amount set pursuant to Section 124977 of the Health and Safety Code and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 24.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.185.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state and certificate of group disability insurance issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in another state on or after January 1, 1994, shall be deemed to include coverage for services related to diagnosis, treatment, and appropriate management of osteoporosis. The services may include, but need not be limited to, all Food and Drug Administration approved technologies, including bone mass measurement technologies as deemed medically appropriate.

(b) This section shall not apply to specified accident, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, or long-term care health insurance policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1208, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.19.

(a) Any disability insurance policy that includes terms that require binding arbitration to settle disputes and that restrict, or provide for a waiver of, the right to a jury trial shall include, in clear and understandable language, a disclosure that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The disclosure shall clearly state whether the plan uses binding arbitration to settle disputes, including specifically whether the plan uses binding arbitration to settle claims of medical malpractice.

(2) The disclosure shall appear as a separate article in the agreement issued to the employer group or individual subscriber and shall be prominently displayed on the enrollment form signed by each subscriber or enrollee.

(3) In any disability insurance policy, the disclosure required by this section shall be displayed immediately before the signature line provided for the representative of the group contracting with a disability insurer and immediately before the signature line provided for the individual enrolling in the policy.

(b) Any disability insurance policy that includes a term that requires the parties to submit to binding arbitration in case of a medical malpractice claim or dispute shall, for those cases or disputes for which the total amount of damages claimed is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, provide for selection by the parties of a single neutral arbitrator who shall have no jurisdiction to award more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If the parties are unable to agree on the selection of a single neutral arbitrator, the method provided in Section 1281.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be utilized.

The provision shall not be subject to waiver by the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.191.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after January 1, 2013, a health insurer that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall utilize and accept only the prior authorization form developed pursuant to subdivision (c), or an electronic prior authorization process described in subdivision (e), when requiring prior authorization for prescription drugs.

(b) (1) If a health insurer, contracted physician group, or utilization review organization fails to notify a prescribing provider of its coverage determination within 72 hours for nonurgent requests, or within 24 hours if exigent circumstances exist, upon receipt of a completed prior authorization or step therapy exception request, the prior authorization or step therapy exception
 request shall be deemed approved for the duration of the prescription, including refills.

(2) If a request for prior authorization or a step therapy exception is incomplete or clinically relevant material information necessary to make a coverage determination is not included, the insurer, contracted physician group, or utilization review organization shall notify the prescribing provider within 72 hours of receipt, or within 24 hours of receipt if exigent circumstances exist, what additional or clinically relevant material information is needed to approve or deny the prior authorization or step therapy exception request, or to appeal the denial thereof. Once the requested information is received, the applicable time period to approve or deny a prior authorization or step therapy exception request, or to appeal, shall begin to elapse. If a coverage determination or request for additional or clinically relevant material information by an insurer,
 contracted physician group, or utilization review organization is not received by the prescribing provider within the time allotted, the prior authorization or step therapy exception request, or appeal of a denial thereof, shall be deemed approved for the duration of the prescription, including refills. In the event of a denial, the insurer, contracted physician group, or utilization review organization shall inform the prescribing provider and insured of the external appeal process under subdivision (h) of this section, which shall also apply to a denial of a prior authorization or step therapy exception request.

(3) A health insurer, contracted physician group, utilization review organization, or external independent review organization shall approve a step therapy exception request, or internal or external appeal of a denial thereof, if any of the criteria in subdivision (c) of Section 10123.201 are satisfied.

(c) On or before January 1, 2017, the department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall jointly develop a uniform prior authorization form. Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2017, or six months after the form is completed pursuant to this section, whichever is later, every prescribing provider shall use that uniform prior authorization form, or an electronic prior authorization process described in subdivision (e), to request prior authorization for coverage of prescription drugs and every health insurer shall accept that form or electronic process as sufficient to request prior authorization for prescription drugs.

(d) The prior authorization form developed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall meet the following criteria:

(1) The form shall not exceed two pages.

(2) The form shall be made electronically available by the department and the health insurer.

(3) The completed form may also be electronically submitted from the prescribing provider to the health insurer.

(4) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall develop the form with input from interested parties from at least one public meeting.

(5) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care, in development of the standardized form, shall take into consideration the following:

(A) Existing prior authorization forms established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) National standards pertaining to electronic prior authorization.

(e) A prescribing provider may use an electronic prior authorization system utilizing the standardized form described in subdivision (c) or an electronic process developed specifically for transmitting prior authorization information that meets the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs’ SCRIPT standard for electronic prior authorization transactions.

(f) Subdivision (a) does not apply if any of the following occurs:

(1) A contracted physician group is delegated the financial risk for the pharmacy or medical drug benefit by a health insurer.

(2) A contracted physician group uses its own internal prior authorization
 process rather than the health insurer’s prior authorization process for the health insurer’s insureds.

(3) A contracted physician group is delegated a utilization management function by the health insurer concerning any prescription drug, regardless of the delegation of financial risk.

(g) For prescription drugs, prior authorization requirements described in subdivisions (c) and (e) apply regardless of how that benefit is classified under the terms of the health insurer’s group or individual policy.

(h) A health insurer shall maintain a process for an external exception request review that complies with subdivision (c) of Section 156.122 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The external appeal process for exception requests shall also apply to a denial of a prior authorization or step therapy exception
 request. An independent review organization’s reversal of a health insurer’s denial of a request for an exception, prior authorization, or a step therapy exception shall be binding on the insurer and shall apply for the duration of the prescription, including refills. An insurer shall notify the insured and prescribing provider of the independent review organization’s coverage determination, or request for additional or clinically relevant material information necessary to make a coverage determination, within the time limits required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). This subdivision shall not affect or limit an insured’s eligibility for independent medical review under Section 10169 or to file an internal appeal with the insurer.

(i) For an individual, small group, or large group health insurance policy, a health insurer that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall comply with subdivision (c) of Section 156.122 of Title 45 of the
 Code of Federal Regulations.

(j) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Prescribing provider” shall include a provider authorized to write a prescription, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4040 of the Business and Professions Code, to treat a medical condition of an insured.

(2) “Exigent circumstances” exist when an insured is suffering from a health condition that may seriously jeopardize the insured’s life, health, or ability to regain maximum function or when an insured is undergoing a current course of treatment using a nonformulary drug.

(3) “Completed prior authorization request” means a completed uniform prior authorization form developed pursuant to subdivision (c), or a completed request submitted using an electronic prior authorization system
 described in subdivision (e), or, for contracted physician groups described in subdivision (f), the process used by the contracted physician group.

(4) “Step therapy exception” means a decision to override a generally applicable step therapy protocol in favor of coverage of the prescription drug prescribed by a health care provider for an individual insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 742, Sec. 4.   (AB 347)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.192.

(a) A health insurer that provides prescription drug benefits and maintains one or more drug formularies shall do all of the following:

(1) Post the formulary or formularies for each product offered by the insurer on the insurer’s Internet Web site in a manner that is accessible and searchable by potential insureds, insureds, providers, the general public, the department, and federal agencies as required by federal law or regulations.

(2) Update the formularies posted pursuant to paragraph (1) with any change to those formularies on a monthly basis.

(3) No later than six months after the date
 that a standard formulary template is developed under subdivision (b), use that template to display the formulary or formularies for each product offered by the insurer.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2017, the department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall jointly, and with input from interested parties from at least one public meeting, develop a standard formulary template for purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). In developing the template, the department and Department of Managed Health Care shall take into consideration existing requirements for reporting of formulary information established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. To the extent feasible, in developing the template, the department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall evaluate a way to include on the template, in addition to the information required to be included under paragraph (2), cost-sharing information for
 drugs subject to coinsurance.

(2) The standard formulary template shall include a notification that the presence of a drug on the insurer’s formulary does not guarantee that an insured will be prescribed that drug by his or her prescribing provider for a particular medical condition. As applied to a particular formulary for a product offered by an insurer, the standard formulary template shall do all of the following:

(A) Include information on cost-sharing tiers and utilization controls, including prior authorization or step therapy requirements, for each drug covered by the product.

(B) Indicate any drugs on the formulary that are preferred over other drugs on the formulary.

(C) Include information to educate insureds about the differences between